Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-1719
Sheriff; deputy; uniforms; specifications.

(1) The uniform required by section 23-1717 shall be at the discretion of the sheriff and may be separated into classes to best fit the needs of each sheriff. Any such uniform shall be readily distinguishable from the uniform of other law enforcement agencies in the State of Nebraska.

(2) The Class A or dress uniform for a county sheriff or their deputies shall consist of:

(a) Brown felt campaign hat, center crease in sheriff or western style;

(b) Brown straw campaign hat, center crease in sheriff or western style;

(c) Chocolate brown color shirt with either long or short sleeves depending on season;

(d) Pink tan color trousers in appropriate seasonal weights;

(e) Pink tan color necktie;

(f) Shoes or boots in the same color as the leather worn;

(g) Chocolate brown color service jacket, zipper front with badge or insignia approved by the sheriff;

(h) Hip-length year-round outer jacket, dark brown in color;

(i) Badge bearing state or state seal, rank, and county and consisting of a seven-point star;

(j) Collar ornaments for sheriff and deputies;

(k) Shoulder emblem to be worn on upper sleeve and include sheriff's office or department and county name - design optional;

(l) Leather to be either brown or black at the individual department's choice; and

(m) Brown winter cap.

(3) The Class B or patrol uniform for a county sheriff or their deputies shall consist of:

(a) Black or any variation of brown hat, depending on the season;

(b) Black or any variation of brown color external carrier, with badge;

(c) Black or any variation of brown color shirt with either long or short sleeves depending on season;

(d) Black or any variation of brown color trousers in appropriate seasonal weights;

(e) Black or any variation of brown color shoes or boots;

(f) Black or any variation of brown color jacket, with a badge or insignia approved by the sheriff;

(g) Badge bearing state or state seal, rank, and county and consisting of a seven-point star;

(h) Shoulder emblem to be worn on upper sleeve and include sheriff's office or department and county name - design optional; and

(i) Leather to be either black or any variation of brown at the individual department's choice.

(4) The honor guard or color guard uniform for a county sheriff or their deputies shall consist of:

(a) Any variation of brown color campaign hat, center crease in sheriff or western style;

(b) Any variation of brown color uniform jacket;

(c) Any variation of brown color pants;

(d) Black leather shoes or boots;

(e) Shoulder emblem to be worn on upper sleeve and include sheriff's office or department and county name - design optional; and

(f) Badge bearing state or state seal, rank, and county and consisting of a seven-point star.

(5) A committee from the Nebraska Sheriffs' Association shall assist in developing specifications for the uniforms.

Laws 1967, c. 113, § 3, p. 361;

Laws 1981, LB 186, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB784, § 4.
July 18, 2026